New Jersey, session 222, A5000.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the Veterans Bill of Rights Act. 2.  a.  (1)  The Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs shall provide to each veteran residing in this State a physical copy and an electronic copy of the Veterans Bill of Rights described in subsection c. of this section. (2)  The commissioner shall publish and maintain on the departments Internet website an electronic copy of the Veterans Bill of Rights. (3)  The commissioner shall maintain a physical copy of the most recent version of the Veterans Bill of Rights in each facility of the department. b.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at law or in equity by any party against this State, department, or any officer or employee thereof. c.  The Veterans Bill of Rights shall inform a veteran of the rights and benefits to which the veteran may be entitled under the laws of this State.  Such rights and benefits shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1)  Veterans have the right to fair treatment.  Veterans shall be treated equally and with respect, regardless of rank, position, or any protected class, in every interaction with the Department of Veterans Affairs and its affiliated service providers. (2)  Veterans have the right to be informed of all eligible programs and benefits upon discharge from a branch of the active or reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard of any state.  Upon discharge, the department shall provide each veteran with a comprehensive handbook detailing all eligible benefits and programs.  This information shall be accessible in print and online, updated annually, and provide information, including, but not limited to, healthcare, education, and housing benefits. (3)  Veterans shall have the right to privacy: (a)  veterans personal information and records shall be strictly protected; (b)  the department shall adhere to the highest standards of data privacy and clearly inform veterans about how their data is used, shared, and protected; and (c)  veterans shall have assurance that all their interactions and records with the department are handled confidentially and securely pursuant to State and federal law. (4)  Veterans have the right of access to quality care: (a)  veterans shall have access to quality care through the departments veterans memorial homes and community providers; and (b)  veterans shall have access to physical and mental health services provided through the department and its community providers, tailored to the veterans unique needs, ensuring they receive the best possible care regardless of location or circumstance. (5)  Veterans have the right to mental health and family support services: (a)  in recognition of the unique psychological impacts of military service, veterans shall have access, when available, to tailored mental health resources, including therapy, counseling, and group support, both in-person and via telehealth; and (b)  support services for veterans families shall be available to foster stability and wellness within the family unit, especially for those experiencing post-military service challenges. (6)  Veterans have the right to employment and housing assistance: (a)  veterans transitioning to civilian life shall have access to employment services, including job training, career counseling, and resume workshops; and (b)  the department shall also provide resources for housing stability, such as assistance in securing affordable housing and support for homelessness prevention for veterans in need. (7)  Veterans have the right to accessibility in services and facilities: (a)  department services shall be accessible to veterans without physical, geographical, or logistical barriers, with reasonable accommodations provided when available; and (b)  the department, through its community providers, when practicable, shall provide telehealth options to serve veterans in remote or underserved areas, ensuring equitable access to services. (8)  Veterans have the right to involvement in decisions affecting their care plans, treatment options, and benefits.  The department shall involve veterans in discussions about their treatments and benefits eligibility, ensuring that the veterans preferences and needs are considered and respected in every decision. (9)  Veterans have the right to transparency in benefits adjudication.  Veterans shall be provided with assistance with the process for adjudicating claims, including receiving clear information on application requirements and necessary documentation. (10)  Veterans have the right to consistent and proactive communication.  The department shall communicate updates or changes to veteran benefits and eligibility by prominently posting on the departments Internet website.  The department shall also post in a timely manner information about new or modified services available to veterans. d.  The department shall maintain a toll-free hotline and a publicly accessible department Internet website through which a veteran may report a complaint regarding compliance with the provisions of this section by the department.  The department shall respond to a veterans complaint not later than 30 days after the department receives the complaint. e.  Not later than once each year, the Commissioner shall submit to the Senate Military and Veterans Affairs Committee and the Assembly Military and Veterans Affairs Committee, or their successor committees, a report regarding compliance by the department with the provisions of this section.  Each report shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements with regards to the preceding year: (1)  The total number of complaints received pursuant to subsections c. and d. of this section, organized by: (a)  category of issue; and (b)  community provider or facility, division, or department within the Department of Veterans Affairs. (2)  The median response times for complaints. (3)  The percentage of complaints resolved within 30 days. (4)  The number of corrective actions taken or policy changes made as a result of complaints or identified noncompliance. (5)  The number of veterans provided information or referrals for community care. (6)  Recommendations, if any, of the commissioner for legislative or administrative action to further the purposes of this section. 3.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month next following enactment, except that the Commissioner of the Department of Veterans Affairs may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.